California statutes. Water Code
(b) If agricultural sources of pollution have been identified as contributing to the degradation of shellfish growing areas, the regional board shall invite members of the local agricultural community representing the type of agricultural discharge affecting the local shellfish growing area, the local resource conservation district, the local soil conservation service, the local agricultural stabilization and conservation service, the cooperative extension of the University of California, and affected shellfish growers to develop and implement appropriate short- and long-term remediation strategies that will lead to a reduction in the pollution affecting the commercial shellfish growing area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14957.

When rating project proposals affecting shellfish growing areas for state and federal funding under Sections 205 and 319 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.; Secs. 1285 and 1329) or from other funding sources, the state board and regional boards shall give timely notice to the California Aquaculture Association and shall provide shellfish growers with the opportunity to comment on the following types of project proposals:

(a) Project proposals that seek to identify the nature, sources, scope, and degree of pollution threatening a commercial shellfish growing area.

(b) Project proposals that seek to reduce or eliminate the impact of point or nonpoint pollution that affects a commercial shellfish growing area. Proposals under this subdivision shall include waste reclamation projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14958.

When a commercial shellfish area is no longer threatened, as specified in Section 14954, the regional board shall dissolve the technical advisory committee for that area. If the area is subsequently threatened, as specified in Section 14954, the regional board shall re-form the committee pursuant to Section 14953.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 27. California Watershed Improvement Act of 2009 [16100. - 16104.]

16100.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Watershed Improvement Act of 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

(a) Each county, city, or special district that is a permittee or copermittee under a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit for municipal separate storm sewer systems may develop, either individually or jointly with one or more permittees or copermittees, a watershed improvement plan that addresses major sources of pollutants in receiving water, stormwater, urban runoff, or other surface runoff pollution within the watershed or subwatershed to which the plan applies. The principal purpose of a watershed improvement plan is to implement existing and future water quality requirements and regulations by, among other things, where appropriate, identifying opportunities for stormwater detention, infiltration, use of natural treatment systems, water recycling, reuse, and supply
 augmentation; and providing programs and measures designed to promote, maintain, or achieve compliance with water quality laws and regulations, including water quality standards and other requirements of statewide plans, regional water quality control plans, total maximum daily loads, and NPDES permits.

(b) The process of developing a watershed improvement plan shall be open and transparent, and shall be conducted consistent with all applicable open meeting laws. A county, city, special district, or combination thereof, shall solicit input from entities representing resource agencies, water agencies, sanitation districts, the environmental community, landowners, home builders, agricultural interests, and business and industry representatives.

(c) Each county, city, special district, or combination thereof shall notify the appropriate
 regional board of its intention to develop a watershed improvement plan. The regional board may, in its discretion, participate in the preparation of the plan. A watershed improvement plan shall be consistent with the regional board’s water quality control plan.

(d) A watershed improvement plan shall include all of the following elements relevant to the waters within the watershed or subwatershed to which the plan applies:

(1) A description of the watershed or subwatershed improvement plan area, the rivers, streams, or manmade drainage channels within the plan area, the agencies with regulatory jurisdiction over matters to be addressed in the plan, the relevant receiving waters within or downstream from the plan area, and the county, city, special district, or combination thereof, participating in the plan.

(2) A description of the proposed facilities and actions that will improve the protection and enhancement of water quality and the designated beneficial uses of waters of the state, consistent with water quality laws and regulations. 

(3) Recommendations for appropriate action by any entity, public or private, to facilitate achievement of, or consistency with, water quality objectives, standards, total maximum daily loads, or other water quality laws, regulations, standards, or requirements, a time schedule for the actions to be taken, and a description of appropriate measurement and monitoring to be undertaken to determine improvement in water quality.

(4) A coordinated economic analysis and financing plan that identifies the costs, effectiveness, and benefits of water
 quality improvements specified in the watershed improvement plan, and, where feasible, incorporates user-based and cost recovery approaches to financing, which place the cost of managing and treating surface runoff pollution on the generators of the pollutants.

(5) To the extent applicable, a description of regional best management practices, watershed-based natural treatment systems, low-flow diversion systems, stormwater capture, urban runoff capture, other measures constituting structural treatment best management practices, pollution prevention measures, low-impact development strategies, and site design, source control, and treatment control best management practices to promote improved water quality.

(6) A description of the proposed structure, operations, powers, and duties of the implementing entity for the watershed
 improvement plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

(a) A regional board shall review, in accordance with the reimbursement requirement described in subdivision (c), a watershed improvement plan developed pursuant to Section 16101 and may approve the plan, including any appropriate conditions to the approval, if the regional board finds that the proposed watershed improvement plan will facilitate compliance with water quality requirements. A regional board’s review and approval of the watershed improvement plan shall be limited to components described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 16101.

(b) A regional board may not approve a proposed watershed improvement plan that includes a geographical area included in an existing approved watershed improvement plan
 unless the regional board determines that it is infeasible to amend either the proposed watershed improvement plan or the approved watershed improvement plan to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The entity or entities that develop a watershed improvement plan that is submitted to the regional board for approval shall reimburse the regional board for its costs, including the costs to review and oversee the implementation of the plan, if nonstate funds are not available to cover the costs of the review and oversight. For the purpose of this paragraph, the state board shall adopt a fee schedule by emergency regulation in the manner prescribed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 13260. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund established by Section 13260.

(d) A regional board may, if it deems appropriate, utilize
 provisions of approved watershed improvement plans to promote compliance with one or more of the regional board’s regulatory plans or programs. 

(e) Unless a regional board incorporates the provisions of a watershed improvement plan into waste discharge requirements issued to a permittee, the implementation of a watershed improvement plan by a permittee shall not be deemed to be compliance with those waste discharge requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

(a) In addition to making use of other financing mechanisms that are available to local agencies to fund watershed improvement plans and plan measures and facilities, a county, city, special district, or combination thereof may impose fees on activities that generate or contribute to runoff, stormwater, or surface runoff pollution, to pay the costs of the preparation of a watershed improvement plan, and the implementation of a watershed improvement plan if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The regional board has approved the watershed improvement plan.

(2) The entity or entities that develop the watershed improvement plan make a finding, supported by substantial evidence, that the fee is reasonably related to the cost of mitigating the actual
 or anticipated past, present, or future adverse effects of the activities of the feepayer. “Activities,” for the purposes of this paragraph, means the operations and existing structures and improvements subject to regulation under an NPDES permit for municipal separate storm sewer systems.

(3) The fee is not imposed solely as an incident of property ownership.

(b) A county, city, special district, or combination thereof may plan, design, implement, construct, operate, and maintain controls and facilities to improve water quality, including controls and facilities related to the infiltration, retention and reuse, diversion, interception, filtration, or collection of surface runoff, including urban runoff, stormwater, and other forms of runoff, the treatment of pollutants in runoff or other waters subject to water quality regulatory requirements, the return of diverted and treated waters to receiving water bodies,
 the enhancement of beneficial uses of waters of the state, or the beneficial use or reuse of diverted waters.

(c) The fees authorized under subdivision (a) may be imposed as user-based or regulatory fees consistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

Nothing in this chapter alters requirements that govern the diversion of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 28. California Wetlands Policy Act [16200. - 16201.]

16200.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) California’s wetland resources provide an abundance of benefits for humans and the environment, including, but not limited to, flood risk reduction, filtration of water pollutants, surface and groundwater supplies, shoreline protection, erosion reduction, wildlife habitat, open space, and public recreational opportunities. Wetlands are an important habitat for migratory waterfowl of the Pacific Flyway, endangered species, and many other resident wildlife and fish populations.

(b) Scientists have determined that though small in area, wetlands are carbon sinks and wetland drainage
 leads to significant carbon and greenhouse gas emissions as stored carbon is oxidized. Management and restoration of wetlands provide many opportunities to restore carbon and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(c) Historical filling and development projects have reduced California wetlands to a mere 10 percent of their original extent. The loss of coastal wetlands is even more alarming with 95 percent of the formerly abundant lagoons and marshes along California’s 1,100-mile coastline having been destroyed.

(d) In 1972, Congress enacted the Clean Water Act, which included a program designed to preserve the nation’s dwindling wetlands. In recent decades, litigation over the extent of federal authority to protect wetlands and federal regulators’ failure to delineate clearly
 that authority has combined to threaten the nation’s few remnant wetlands.

(e) The United States Supreme Court issued a ruling in Sackett v. Environmental Protection Agency (2023) 598 U.S. 651 that has had enormous ramifications for the health of the nation’s and California’s wetlands and waterways because it excluded many types of state waters, including certain wetlands, from federal Clean Water Act protection. 

(f) The Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act applies to waters of the state, which includes wetlands and other isolated and ephemeral waters. The State of California and the state board possess independent power to protect and preserve the state’s remaining wetlands.

(g) In 2019, the state board
 adopted the “State Policy for Water Quality Control: State Wetland Definition and Procedures for Discharges of Dredged or Fill Material to Waters of the State.” The state board adopted this state policy to ensure that California would protect wetlands no longer protected by federal law. 

(h) The action by the state board builds on the history of California’s efforts to conserve, protect, and restore wetlands. On August 23, 1993, Governor Pete Wilson issued Executive Order No. W-59-93, in which he recognized the importance of wetlands to California, the extreme loss of wetlands during the 19th and 20th centuries, and the need to ensure no net loss and long-term gain in the quantity, quality, and permanence of wetlands acreage and values in a manner that fosters creativity, stewardship, and respect for private property.

(i) Since Governor Wilson’s executive order establishing a state policy of no net loss and long-term gain of wetlands, California has continued to lose more wetland acres than it replaces through restoration or mitigation. As these wetlands disappear, more wetland-dependent fish and wildlife slide closer to extinction and migratory birds are crowded into shrinking habitat areas that cause devastating outbreaks of disease and fail to provide the food necessary for these birds to make their long journeys between their summer and winter homes. California continues to remove lands that, if conserved, would provide important public benefits.

(j) It is essential that California protect its last remaining wetlands and restore wetlands to achieve long-term gains for climate mitigation and
 resilience, flood risk reduction, clean water, biodiversity conservation, and recreation.

(k) It is the intent of the Legislature that the implementation of the state policy of no net loss and long-term gain of wetlands is not measured on a permit-by-permit basis. This state policy will take efforts on multiple scales to achieve, including thoughtful project design and implementation, conservation of wetlands, restoration of wetlands, and landscape scale conservation planning.

(l) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify the fundamental principles of the state wetlands policy to protect, restore, and expand California wetlands, and to concurrently ensure the state
 facilitates and encourages the enhancement and restoration of wetlands to prevent the loss of habitat due to inundation from sea level rise and other impacts associated with climate change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 2875)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16201.

It is the policy of the state to ensure no net loss and long-term gain in the quantity, quality, and permanence of wetlands acreage and values in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 2875)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. FINANCIAL SUPERVISION OF DISTRICTS [20200. - 20220.]



CHAPTER 2. Compensation of Water District Directors [20200. - 20207.]

20200.

As used in this chapter, “water district” means any district or other political subdivision, other than a city or county, a primary function of which is the irrigation, reclamation, or drainage of land or the diversion, storage, management, or distribution of water primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, fish and wildlife enhancement, flood control, or power production purposes. “Water districts” include, but are not limited to, irrigation districts, county water districts, California water districts, water storage districts, reclamation districts, county waterworks districts, drainage districts, water replenishment districts, levee districts, municipal water districts, water conservation districts, community services districts, water management districts, flood control districts, flood control and floodwater conservation districts, flood control and water conservation districts, water management agencies, water agencies, and public utility districts formed pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 213, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of any water district may, by ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter, provide compensation to members of the governing board, unless any compensation is prohibited by its principal act, in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board, or for each day’s service rendered as a member of the board by request of the board, and may, by ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter, in accordance with Section 20202, increase the compensation received by members of the governing board above the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any future increase in compensation received by members of the governing board of a water district be authorized by an ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter and not by an act of the Legislature.

For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.5.

Reimbursement for expenses of members of a governing board of a water district is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

20202.

In any ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter to increase the amount of compensation which may be received by members of the governing board of a water district above the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day, the increase may not exceed an amount equal to 5 percent, for each calendar year following the operative date of the last adjustment, of the compensation which is received when the ordinance is adopted.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall authorize compensation for more than a total of 10 days in any calendar month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20203.

Any water district described in Section 20201 is authorized to adopt ordinances pursuant to this chapter. No ordinance shall be adopted pursuant to this chapter except following a public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20204.

An ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall become effective 60 days from the date of its final passage. The voters of any water district shall have the right, as provided in this chapter, to petition for referendum on any ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20205.

If a petition protesting against the adoption of the ordinance is presented to the governing board of the water district prior to the effective date of the ordinance, the ordinance shall be suspended and the governing board shall reconsider the ordinance.

If the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the water district exceeds 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 5 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the water district for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election. If the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the water district is less than 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the water district for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.

If the governing board does not entirely repeal the ordinance against which a petition is filed, the governing board shall submit the ordinance to the voters either at a regular election or a special election called for the purpose. The ordinance shall not become effective unless and until a majority of the votes cast at the election are cast in favor of it. If the ordinance is not approved by the voters, no new ordinance may be adopted by the governing board pursuant to this chapter for at least one year following the date of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of the Elections Code applicable to the right of referendum on legislative acts of districts shall govern the procedure on ordinances against which a petition is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Water District Taxes [20220. - 20220.]

20220.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a mobilehome used primarily for residential purposes and located on rental spaces within a mobilehome park is not property subject to ad valorem property taxes for debt service of any water district or of any improvement district therein.

(b) As used in this chapter, “water district” means any district or other political subdivision, other than a city or county, a primary function of which is the irrigation, reclamation, or drainage of land or the diversion, storage, or distribution of water primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, fish and wildlife enhancement, flood control, or power production purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 179.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. IRRIGATION DISTRICTS [20500. - 29978.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [20500. - 20627.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [20500. - 20500.]

20500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Irrigation District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [20510. - 20543.]

20510.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20511.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20512.

“Include” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20513.

“District” means any irrigation district formed pursuant to any law of this State or to this division except the Palo Verde Irrigation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20514.

“Improvement district” means an improvement district formed pursuant to the Irrigation District Improvement Act or to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20516.

“Rules” include “regulations.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20517.

“Land” except in Chapter 2A (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 7 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 26875) of Part 11 means land in the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

20518.

“Principal county” means the county in which all the land is situated, or if the land is situated in more than one county, the county in which the greatest portion of the area of the land is situated.

In proceedings for consolidation or reorganization of districts having different principal counties, the term “principal county” means the county in which the greatest portion of the total combined acreage in the districts to be consolidated or reorganized is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

20519.

“Affected county” means any county in which land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20520.

“Office county” means the county in which the principal office of a district is kept.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------

20521.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20522.

“President” means the president of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20523.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20524.

“Elective officers” irrespective of the method of selection in any particular instance are:

(a) A director from each division except as otherwise provided in this division.

(b) An assessor, a collector, and a treasurer, except when one or more of such officers are appointed pursuant to Section 21123.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

20525.

“General district election” is the district election required to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20526.

“Bond election” means an election provided for in Chapter 4 of Part 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.

“Elector,” “voter,” and “precinct board” have respectively the same meaning as in the Elections Code, but an “elector” or “voter” shall also be a resident of the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.5.

Notwithstanding Section 20527, or any other provision of law to the contrary, in the Jackson Valley Irrigation District every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at elections for directors or otherwise. Such owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. The last equalized assessment book of the district is conclusive evidence of the ownership of real property so owned, except that in the event that an assessment for a district shall not have been made and levied for the year in which the election is held or an equalized assessment book prepared, the last equalized county assessment roll shall be used in lieu of the assessment book of the district. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of such land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of such land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of such corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property, and means a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who: (a) Is appointed under the laws of this state.(b) Is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.(c) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he seeks to exercise.Before a legal representative votes at a district election he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 20527, or any other provision of law to the contrary, in the Camp Far West Irrigation District in Placer and Yuba Counties, “elector” and “voter” shall mean a person, corporation, or other entity owning land within the district. At any district election in the Camp Far West Irrigation District, only landowners may vote, and they need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. Each landowner shall have one vote for each dollar’s worth of land to which he or she holds title. The last equalized assessment book of the district shall be conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of the land so owned, except that in the event that an assessment for the district shall not have been made and levied for the year in which the election is held, the last equalized assessment roll of the county in which the land is located shall be used in lieu of the assessment book of the district. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land may designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter. In the absence of that designation each owner shall be entitled to vote his pro rata share of the total value of the land in such multiple ownership.

 (b) Every landowner, or the legal representative of a corporation, estate, or trust owning land within the district, may vote at any district election, either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy.

 (c) As used in this section, “legal representative” means any of the following:

(1) An authorized official of a corporation owning land in the district.

(2) The trustees of an express trust which owns land in the district.

(3) The executor, administrator, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of a holder of title to land in the district who is appointed under the laws of this state, is entitled to possession of the land, and who is authorized by the appointing court to vote in the election.

 (d) Before a legal representative votes at a district election, he or she shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority, which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election. No appointment of a proxy shall be valid, accepted, or vote allowed thereon at any district election unless it meets all the following requirements:

(1) It is in writing.

(2) It is executed by the person or legal representative of the person who is entitled to the votes for which the proxy is given.

(3) It is acknowledged.

(4) It specifies the election at which it is to be used. An appointment of a proxy shall be used only at the election specified.

 (e) Every appointment of a proxy is revocable at the pleasure of the person executing it at any time before the person appointed as proxy shall have cast a ballot representing the votes for which the appointment was given.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter, as defined in this section, is eligible to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Camp Far West Irrigation District, provided that the voter shall be a freeholder within the division that the voter represents, during the entire term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.7.

Notwithstanding Section 20527, or any other provision of law, in the Montague Water Conservation District in Siskiyou County every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at elections for directors or otherwise. Such owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. The last equalized county assessment role is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property so owned. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of such land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of such land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of such corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who:

(a) Is appointed under the laws of this state.

(b) Is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(c) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he seeks to exercise. Before a legal representative votes at a district election, he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

Every voter, or his legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy, but shall be entitled to cast only one vote. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005.

Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter as defined in this section is eligible to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Montague Water Conservation District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.8.

Notwithstanding Section 20527, or any other provision of law, in the Cordua Irrigation District every owner of land within the district, but no others, may vote at elections for directors or otherwise. Such owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. Each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of land to which he has title. The last equalized county assessment role is conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of the land so owned. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of such land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of such land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of such corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who:

(a) Is appointed under the laws of this state.

(b) Is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(c) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he seeks to exercise. Before a legal representative votes at a district election, he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

Every voter, or his legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005.

Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter as defined in this section is eligible to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Cordua Irrigation District or to serve as an elective officer of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.9.

Notwithstanding Section 20527, or any other provision of law, in the Provident Irrigation District in Glenn and Colusa Counties every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at elections for directors or otherwise. Such owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. The last equalized county assessment role is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property so owned. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of such land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of such land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of such corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who:

(a) Is appointed under the laws of this state.

(b) Is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(c) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he seeks to exercise. Before a legal representative votes at a district election, he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

Every voter, or his legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy, but shall be entitled to cast only one vote. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005.

Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter as defined in this section is eligible to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Provident Irrigation District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.91.
